Utah statutes.
53B-16-102.   Changes in curriculum -- Substantial alterations in institutional operations -- Periodic review of programs -- Career and technical education curriculum changes.

(1)  Under procedures and policies approved by the board and developed in consultation with each institution of higher education, each institution may make such changes in its curriculum as necessary to better effectuate the institutional role previously approved by the board.

(2)  Notice of a change in the curriculum shall in all cases be promptly submitted to the board.

(3)  The board shall establish procedures and policies for considering institutional proposals for substantial alterations in the scope of existing institutional operations.

(4)  Alterations shall not be made without prior approval of the state board.

(5)  For purposes of this section, "substantial alteration" means the establishment of a branch, extension center, college, professional school, division, institute, department, or a new program in instruction, research, or public services or a new degree, diploma, or certificate.

(6)  The board shall conduct periodic reviews of all programs of instruction, research, and public service at each institution, including those funded by gifts, grants, and contracts, and may require the modification or termination of any program.

(7)  Prior to requiring modification or termination of a program, the board shall give the institution adequate opportunity for a hearing before the board.

(8)  In making decisions related to career and technical education curriculum changes, the board shall request a review of the proposed changes by the State Board of Education and the Utah College of Applied Technology to ensure an orderly and systematic career and technical education curriculum that eliminates overlap and duplication of course work with the high schools and the Utah College of Applied Technology.

